Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-162.01
State Forester; appointment; duties.

There is hereby created within the University of Nebraska the office of State Forester. The State Forester shall be appointed by the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, shall be responsible, subject to the direction of the Board of Regents, for all forestry education and services of the University of Nebraska, and shall have general supervision in the State of Nebraska of (1) all educational work in forestry, including but not limited to demonstrations, publications and mass media information, and (2) service programs relating to forestry and forestation, including but not limited to tree distribution and planting, wildland fire control, development, protection and use of forest resources, and other programs promoting forestry and forestation.

Laws 1967, c. 585, § 1, p. 1974;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 85-163.02.